Hawaii, session 2026, SB1225.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII: SECTION 1.  The legislature finds that the state constitution is at times amended when voters in a general election approve a proposed amendment that has been placed on the election ballot.  The legislature further finds that the manner in which ballot responses are required to be counted for state constitutional amendment purposes, by deeming ballots left blank, spoiled, or over voted as a vote in opposition to the proposed amendment, is confusing and may lead to a result unintended by the voter. Pursuant to the state constitution, the standard for passage of a proposed constitutional amendment at a general election is two-fold.  First, a majority of voters must have voted "yes" on the proposed amendment question, based on the "majority of all the votes tallied upon the question" requirement that appears in article XVII, section 2 of the Constitution of the State of Hawaii.  Second, this majority must also represent a majority of all votes cast in the election, based on that same section's requirement that the majority constitute "at least fifty per cent of the total vote cast at the election."  In practical terms, this means that all ballots that are validly returned are considered to have been cast.  So if the voter responded to the proposed amendment question by leaving the answer blank, spoiling the ballot, or over voting, the answer is counted as a "no" vote.  Thus, when factoring in all votes cast, the actual threshold for passage of a state constitutional amendment can be significantly higher than fifty per cent of voters voting "yes" or "no" on the question. Accordingly, the purpose of this Act is to propose an amendment to article XVII, section 3 of the Constitution of the State of Hawaii regarding the standard for ratification of a constitutional amendment proposed by the legislature to require that a majority of all the votes tallied upon the question be a "yes" vote, and not include blank, spoiled, and over votes in determining whether a majority was reached.  Only ballots that indicate a "no" vote will be counted as "no." The legislature notes that this proposed amendment is not intended to change the standard for tabulating votes on constitutional amendments that are generated by a constitutional convention, and will therefore leave unamended the relevant language in article XVII, section 2 of the Constitution of the State of Hawaii. SECTION 2.  Article XVII, section 3, of the Constitution of the State of Hawaii is amended to read as follows: "AMENDMENTS PROPOSED BY LEGISLATURE Section 3.  The legislature may propose amendments to the constitution by adopting the same, in the manner required for legislation, by a two-thirds vote of each house on final reading at any session, after either or both houses shall have given the governor at least ten days' written notice of the final form of the proposed amendment, or, with or without such notice, by a majority vote of each house on final reading at each of two successive sessions. Upon such adoption, the proposed amendments shall be entered upon the journals, with the ayes and noes, and published once in each of four successive weeks in at least one newspaper of general circulation in each senatorial district wherein such a newspaper is published, within the two months' period immediately preceding the next general election. At such general election the proposed amendments shall be submitted to the electorate for approval or rejection upon a separate ballot. [The conditions of and requirements for ratification of such proposed amendments shall be the same as provided in section 2 of this article for ratification at a general election.] The proposed amendments shall be effective only if approved at a general election by a majority of all the votes tallied upon the question." SECTION 3. The question to be printed on the ballot shall be as follows: "Under the existing language of the Constitution of the State of Hawaii, amendments to the Constitution of the State of Hawaii that are proposed by the Legislature are only effective if approved at a general election by a majority of all votes tallied upon the question, this majority constituting at least fifty percent of the total vote cast at the election. Shall the Constitution of the State of Hawaii be amended to change that standard for voter approval of constitutional amendments that are proposed by the Legislature by removing the requirement that the majority of all votes tallied upon the question must constitute at least fifty percent of the total vote cast at the election?" SECTION 4. Constitutional material to be repealed is bracketed and stricken.  New constitutional material is underscored. SECTION 5. This Act shall take effect on July 1, 3000; provided that this amendment shall take effect upon compliance with article XVII, section 3, of the Constitution of the State of Hawaii.